New Jersey, session 221, S3121.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   1a.1  In the interest of public safety, every municipal authority created pursuant to P.L.1957, c.183 (C.40:14B-1 et seq.) shall assume the same responsibility for the inspection, maintenance, 1[and]1 repair 1, and cost of operation1 of fire hydrants located on streets and roads in planned real estate developments within its service borders, regardless of whether those roads or streets are dedicated to the municipality in which the planned real estate development is located, as it exercises over fire hydrants located along public streets and roads.  1[Such a] A1 municipal authority shall inspect, maintain, 1[and]1 repair, 1and pay the cost of operation of1 fire hydrants located on streets and roads in planned real estate developments within its service borders in the same manner and to the same extent as fire hydrants that are not located in planned real estate developments are inspected, maintained, and repaired by that authority. 1b.1  As used in this 1[act] section1,planned real estate development means any real property situated within the State, whether contiguous or not, which consists of or will consist of, separately owned areas, irrespective of form, be it lots, parcels, units, or interest, and which are offered or disposed of pursuant to a common promotional plan, and providing for common or shared elements or interests in real property, but shall not include timeshares. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.